Utah statutes.
20A-1-304.   Tie votes.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), if two or more candidates for a position have an equal and the highest number of votes for any office, the election officer shall determine by lot which candidate is selected in a public meeting in the presence of each person subject to the tie within 30 days of the canvass or within 30 days of the recount if one is requested or held.

(2)  For any municipal primary election, if two or more candidates for a position have an equal and the highest number of votes for any office, the election officer shall determine by lot which candidate is selected in a public meeting in the presence of each person subject to the tie within five days of the canvass or within five days of the recount if one is requested or held.

